Georgia, session 2025_26, SB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
10 SECTION 1.
11 Chapter 3 of Title 46 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to electrical service,
12 is amended by adding a new part to Article 1, relating to generation and distribution of
13 electricity generally, and amending Article 2, which is reserved, as follows:
S. B. 203
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0481
14 "Part 6
15 46-3-80.
16 This part shall be known and may be cited as the 'Georgia Homegrown Solar Act of 2025.'
17 46-3-81.
18 The General Assembly finds that it is in the public interest to:
19 (1) Continue to encourage private investment in solar resources in the service territory
20 of Georgia's largest electric utility;
21 (2) Stimulate economic growth and job creation in this state;
22 (3) Promote energy resilience; and
23 (4) Enable customers in this state to access solar technologies that help them manage
24 their electric bills.
25
26 46-3-82.
27 As used in this part, the term:
28 (1) 'Avoided cost' means the incremental cost to an electric utility which, but for the
29 provision of energy and capacity from a solar technology, such electric utility would
30 incur to generate or procure electricity from another source.
31 (2) 'Bill credit' means the monetary value of kilowatt hours generated by a community
32 solar facility allocated to a subscriber's electricity bill pursuant to the community solar
33 program created by the commission and subject to commission jurisdiction as described
34 in this part.
35 (3) 'Community solar facility' means a system that:
36 (A) Generates electric energy that is fueled solely by ambient sunlight and is connected
37 to the electric utility's distribution system;
38 (B) Is located within the same electric service territory as the customers it serves;
S. B. 203
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0481
39 (C) Has no subscribers that own a subscription for more than 40 percent of such
40 facility's output;
41 (D) Is not selling its energy outside of the community solar program; and
42 (E)(i) Except as provided in division (ii) of this subparagraph, is not located on the
43 same parcel as another system that meets the requirements of subparagraphs (A)
44 through (D) of this paragraph if the total capacity of the systems would exceed 5
45 megawatts alternating current; provided, however, that such parcel shall not have
46 been subdivided in order to meet such requirements.
47 (ii) The requirements of division (i) of this subparagraph shall not apply to an
48 aggregate of multiple systems that together do not exceed 5 megawatts alternating
49 current if such systems are located on the rooftops of buildings, on brownfield
50 properties, as such term is defined in Code Section 48-5-7.6, deemed to be in
51 compliance with risk reduction standards, on landfills, or over parking lots or
52 roadways.
53 (4) 'Community solar organization' means any for profit or nonprofit entity that owns,
54 operates, or manages subscriptions for one or more community solar facilities.
55 (5) 'Electric utility' means any retail supplier of electricity whose rates are fixed by the
56 commission, and shall not include any electric membership corporation or municipal
57 electric utility.
58 (6) 'Subscriber' means a retail customer of an electric utility that owns one or more
59 subscriptions of a community solar facility.
60 46-3-83.
61 A community solar organization:
62 (1) May sell subscriptions at a rate that shall result in bill savings for the subscriber;
63 provided, however, that such subscriptions shall be sized such that the estimated credits
S. B. 203
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0481
64 do not exceed 90 percent of the subscriber's average or expected annual bill for the
65 customer account to which the subscription is attributed;
66 (2) Shall not require credit checks or up-front, sign-on, or exit fees to purchase, transfer
67 or terminate a subscription;
68 (3) Shall provide the electric utility with information necessary to allocate bill credits to
69 each subscriber;
70 (4) May bank unsubscribed energy for no more than 24 months at which point such
71 energy shall be purchased by the electric utility at avoided cost;
72 (5) May transfer or retire on behalf of subscribers the renewable energy credits produced
73 by its community solar facilities; and
74 (6) Shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to
75 this part; provided, however, that the sale or transfer of subscriptions shall not be
76 considered the provision of electric service to the public, retail electric service, or retail
77 supply of electricity and neither the subscriber nor the community solar organization shall
78 be considered an electric supplier within the meaning of Part 1 of this article or in
79 violation of exclusive electric service rights arising therein.
80 46-3-84.
81 (a) On or before January 1, 2027, the commission shall establish a program that affords
82 customers the opportunity to participate in community solar projects and which shall
83 reasonably allow for the creation, financing, and accessibility of community solar facilities.
84 Under such program:
85 (1) Electric utilities shall provide bill credits to subscribers derived from the utility's total
86 aggregate retail rate on a per-customer-class basis, less commission approved distribution
87 cost components;
88 (2) Excess credits on a subscriber's bill shall role over from month to month until the end
89 of each calendar year and any such excess credits shall automatically be applied to the
S. B. 203
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0481
90 next electric bill of a subscriber when the subscriber's subscription is terminated for any
91 reason;
92 (3) Electric utilities shall provide to community solar organizations a web based hosting
93 capacity tool to indicate where and how much available capacity exists on the distribution
94 system, updated on at least a semiannual basis;
95 (4) Electric utilities may impose fees on community solar organizations which fees, if
96 any, shall be:
97 (A) Just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory;
98 (B) Based on the actual cost of providing the service for which the fee is imposed;
99 (C) Approved by the commission after public notice, a public hearing, and an
100 opportunity for public comment; and
101 (D) Not more than 1 percent of the bill credit value accrued from such organization's
102 subscriptions during the term for which the fee is imposed, unless found by the
103 commission to be necessary to protect the public interest; and
104 (5) Electric utilities may, notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 46-3A-3, enter
105 into a long-term purchase agreement with a community solar organization.
106 (b) The commission may establish rules and regulations that provide for the protection of
107 customers that have subscriptions with or are prospective subscribers of a community solar
108 facility. Such rules and regulations may relate to the totality of the subscription and the bill
109 crediting process, including requiring standardized customer disclosure forms that identify
110 key information that shall be provided by community solar organizations to potential
111 subscribers.
112 46-3-85.
113 (a) On and after July 1, 2025, an electric utility shall accept interconnection applications
114 for community solar facilities on a nondiscriminatory basis and study the impact of
115 interconnecting such facilities to the grid using the current commission approved
S. B. 203
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0481
116 interconnection rules, regulations, standards, and tariffs and in accordance with best
117 practices.
118 (b) On or before January 1, 2026, the commission shall establish an Interconnection
119 Working Group between electric utilities and stakeholders with oversight from commission
120 staff. The Interconnection Working Group shall review and recommend changes or
121 adoption of any policies, processes, rules, regulations, standards, and tariffs associated with
122 the interconnection of community solar facilities with the goal of transparency, accuracy,
123 and efficiency to support the achievement of the objectives in this part. The
124 Interconnection Working Group shall report its findings and recommendations to the
125 commission on or before July 1, 2026. The commission shall review the findings and
126 recommendations of the Interconnection Working Group and take any action that the
127 commission deems necessary.
128 (c) On or before October 1, 2026, each electric utility shall submit for commission review
129 and approval a standard interconnection agreement for community solar facilities that
130 meets the following requirements:
131 (1) An electric utility may recover any direct costs associated with interconnecting and
132 administering metering services as approved by the commission. Any fees imposed shall
133 be:
134 (A) Just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory;
135 (B) Based on the actual cost of providing the service for which the fee is imposed; and
136 (C) Approved by the commission after public notice, a public hearing, and an
137 opportunity for public comment;
138 (2) A community solar facility shall include, at the interconnection applicant's own
139 expense, all equipment necessary to meet applicable safety, power quality, and
140 interconnection requirements established by the National Electrical Code, National
141 Electrical Safety Code, Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and
142 Underwriters Laboratories;
S. B. 203
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0481
143 (3) An electric utility shall not require an interconnection applicant whose community
144 solar facility meets the standards in paragraph (2) of this subsection to comply with
145 additional safety or performance standards, perform or pay for additional tests, or
146 purchase additional liability insurance; and
147 (4) No electric utility shall be liable to any person, directly or indirectly, for any loss of
148 property, injury, or death that may result from the interconnection of a community solar
149 facility.
150 46-3-86.
151 On or before January 1, 2027, each electric utility shall file for commission review a data
152 access program. Such data access program shall be designed to better enable customers'
153 investments in or subscriptions to conservation and clean energy technologies, including,
154 but not limited to, photovoltaic solar, energy efficiency technologies, battery storage, smart
155 thermostats, and electric vehicles. Following public notice and an opportunity for public
156 comment, the commission shall adopt or amend such proposed program, which the electric
157 utility shall make available to customers within nine months of the commission's final
158 order. An electric utility's data access program shall conform to the following
159 requirements:
160 (1) As part of basic utility service, an electric utility shall provide meter usage data in
161 electronic machine-readable form, without additional charge, to the customer or to any
162 third-party recipient to whom the customer has authorized disclosure of the customer's
163 meter usage data. Such access shall conform to nationally recognized open standards and
164 best practices and shall be provided in 15 minute intervals or the shortest interval
165 available through existing meters;
166 (2) An electric utility shall maintain and provide at least 24 months of meter usage data
167 or the period of time that a customer has had an account at a given address, whichever is
168 less; and
S. B. 203
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0481
169 (3) If requests are made for information other than meter usage data or data older than
170 24 months preceding the request, the electric utility may charge customers a reasonable
171 fee to provide such data that is established by the commission based on the electric
172 utility's marginal cost to provide such data.
173 ARTICLE 2
174 46-3-70. 46-3-90.
175 Reserved."
176 SECTION 2.
177 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
178 SECTION 3.
179 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 203
- 8 -